apertium-fra.fra.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 48441
	Sdefs: 74
	Paradigms: 347
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools sort -alignBidix -ignorecase new.metadix new2.metadix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäãçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀlłČŽčćšśžźőßœæŒ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="top" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="ND" /> 
    <sdef n="ppres" /> 
    <sdef n="un" 	c="No gender"/> 
    <sdef n="org" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!\|]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l>      <r></r></p><re>[.\?;:!\|]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separ">
  <e>       <re>¿</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[«\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[»\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="emails">
  <e>       <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="urls">
  <e>       <re>(((www.)|(http://|https://|ftp://))[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-]+([.][áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z]+)+(/[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9_]+)*([.][áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z]+)*)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="S__enc1">
  <e>       <p><l>-les</l>      <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-la</l>       <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-le</l>       <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-le</l>       <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-moi</l>      <r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-toi</l>      <r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-soi</l>      <r>se<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-lui</l>      <r>lui<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-leur</l>     <r>leur<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-nous</l>     <r>nous<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-vous</l>     <r>vous<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-y</l>        <r>y<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/frère__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>frère</l>     <r>frère<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>frères</l>    <r>frère<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sœur</l>      <r>frère<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sœurs</l>     <r>frère<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>soeur</l>     <r>frère<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>soeurs</l>    <r>frère<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dou/x__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>x<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>x<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>x</l>         <r>x<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>x</l>         <r>x<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>x</l>         <r>x<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="andalou__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="andalou__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mali/n__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gne</l>       <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ges</l>       <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/ec__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ec</l>        <r>ec<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èche</l>      <r>ec<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èches</l>     <r>ec<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ecs</l>       <r>ec<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fran/c__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ches</l>      <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>che</l>       <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cs</l>        <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fran/c_peuple__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ques</l>      <r>c_peuple<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>que</l>       <r>c_peuple<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cs</l>        <r>c_peuple<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>c_peuple<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="frère"><i></i><par n="/frère__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aigre-doux"><i>aigre-dou</i><par n="dou/x__adj"/></e>
<e lm="andalou"><i>andalou</i><par n="andalou__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bleu-blanc"><i>bleu-blan</i><par n="fran/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bénin"><i>béni</i><par n="mali/n__adj"/></e>
<e lm="doux"><i>dou</i><par n="dou/x__adj"/></e>
<e lm="franc" c="sincère"><i>fran</i><par n="fran/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="franc" c="peuple"><p><l>fran</l>                <r>fran</r></p><par n="fran/c_peuple__adj"/></e>
<e lm="malin"><i>mali</i><par n="mali/n__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rouge-blanc"><i>rouge-blan</i><par n="fran/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sec"><i>s</i><par n="s/ec__adj"/></e>
<e lm="andalou"><i>andalou</i><par n="andalou__n"/></e>
<e>       <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>       <par n="emails"/></e>
<e>       <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>       <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>       <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>       <par n="separ"/></e>
<e>       <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>       <par n="urls"/></e>
